Hawaii statutes.
§486-114 Advertising packages for sale.
Whenever a package is advertised in any manner, excluding its labeling, and the
retail price of the package is stated in the advertisement, there shall be
closely and conspicuously associated with such statement of price a declaration
of the basic quantity of contents of the package as is required by law or rule
to appear on the package; provided that, where the law or rule requires a dual
declaration of net quantity to appear on the package, only the declaration that
sets forth the quantity in terms of the smaller unit of measure (the
declaration that is required to appear first and without parentheses on the
package) need appear in the advertisement; and provided further that there
shall not be included as part of the declaration required under this section
such qualifying terms as "when packed", "minimum",
"not less than", or other terms of similar import, nor any term
qualifying a unit of measure (for example, "jumbo", "giant",
"full", and the like) that tends to exaggerate the amount of
commodity in the package. [L 1991, c 153, pt of §6; am L 1993, c 54, §9]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next